Washington statutes.
RCW 26.16.095

Purchaser of community real property protected by record title.

Whenever any person, married, in a state registered domestic partnership, or single, having in his or her name the legal title of record to any real estate, shall sell or dispose of the same to an actual bona fide purchaser, a deed of such real estate from the person holding such legal record title to such actual bona fide purchaser shall be sufficient to convey to, and vest in, such purchaser the full legal and equitable title to such real estate free and clear of any and all claims of any and all persons whatsoever, not appearing of record in the auditor's office of the county in which such real estate is situated.

[ 2008 c 6 s 610; 1891 c 151 s 1; RRS s 10577. Formerly RCW 64.04.080.] [SLC-RO-16]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Saving—1891 c 151: "In so far as this act affects married persons having already acquired and now holding real estate under existing laws, a period of three months from the date at which this act shall take effect is hereby allowed to such persons within which to comply with its provisions." [ 1891 c 151 s 4.] This applies to RCW 26.16.095 through 26.16.110.